California statutes. Probate Code
(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the court in a conservatorship proceeding may not waive the filing of a bond or reduce the amount of bond required, without a good cause determination by the court which shall include a determination by the court that the conservatee will not suffer harm as a result of the waiver or reduction of the bond. Good cause may not be established merely by the conservator having filed a bond in another or prior proceeding.

(b) In a conservatorship proceeding, where the conservatee, having sufficient capacity to do so, has waived the filing of a bond, the court in its discretion may permit the filing of a bond in an amount less than would otherwise be required under Section 2320.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 493, Sec. 20.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

2322.

One appointed only as guardian of the person or conservator of the person need not file a bond unless required by the court.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

2323.

(a) The court may dispense with the requirement of a bond if it appears likely that the estate will satisfy the conditions of subdivision (a) of Section 2628 for its duration.

(b) If at any time it appears that the estate does not satisfy the conditions of subdivision (a) of Section 2628, the court shall require the filing of a bond unless the court determines that good cause exists, as provided in Section 2321.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 293, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

2324.

If the person making the nomination has waived the filing of the bond, a guardian nominated under Section 1500 or 1501 need not file a bond unless required by the court.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

2325.

The surety on the bond of a nonprofit charitable corporation described in Section 2104 shall be an admitted surety insurer.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

2326.

(a) If joint guardians or conservators are appointed, the court may order that separate bonds or a joint bond or a combination thereof be furnished.

(b) If a joint bond is furnished, the liability on the bond is joint and several.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

2327.

(a) In a conservatorship proceeding, the court shall order a separate bond for each conservatee, except where the assets of the conservatees are commingled in which case a combined bond that covers all assets may be provided.

(b) If a guardianship proceeding involves more than one ward, the court may order separate bonds, or a single bond which is for the benefit of two or more wards in that proceeding, or a combination thereof.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 563, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

2328.

(a) In any proceeding to determine the amount of the bond of the guardian or conservator (whether at the time of appointment or subsequently), if the estate includes property which has been or will be deposited with a trust company or financial institution pursuant to Sections 2453 to 2456, inclusive, upon the condition that the property, including any earnings thereon, will not be withdrawn except on authorization of the court, the court, in its discretion, with or without notice, may so order and may do either of the following:

(1) Exclude the property deposited in determining the amount of the required bond or reduce the amount of the bond to be required in respect to the property deposited to such an amount as the court determines is reasonable.

(2) If a bond has already been furnished or the amount fixed, reduce the amount to such an amount as the court determines is reasonable.

(b) The petitioner for letters, or the proposed guardian or conservator in advance of appointment of a guardian or conservator, may do any one or more of the following:

(1) Deliver personal property in the person’s possession to a trust company. 

(2) Deliver money in the person’s possession for deposit in an insured account in a financial institution in this state.

(3) Allow a trust company to retain personal property already in its possession.

(4) Allow a financial institution in this state to retain money already invested in an insured account in a financial institution.

(c) In the cases described in subdivision (b), the petitioner or proposed guardian or conservator shall obtain and file with the court a written receipt including the agreement of the trust company or financial institution that the property deposited, including any earnings thereon, shall not be allowed to be withdrawn except upon authorization of the court.

(d) In receiving and retaining property on deposit pursuant to subdivisions (b) and (c), the trust company or financial institution is protected to the same extent as though it received the property on deposit from a person to whom letters had been issued.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

2329.

(a) If a guardian or conservator moves the court for reduction in the amount of the bond, the motion shall include an affidavit setting forth the condition of the estate.

(b) Except upon a showing of good cause, the amount of the bond shall not be reduced below the amount determined pursuant to Section 2320.

(c) Nothing in this section limits the authority of the court to reduce the amount of the bond with or without notice under Section 2328.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

2330.

Upon the confirmation of the sale of any real property of the estate, or upon the authorization of the borrowing of money secured by a mortgage or deed of trust on real property of the estate, the guardian or conservator shall furnish an additional bond as is required by the court in order to make the sum of the bonds furnished by the guardian or conservator equal to the amount determined pursuant to Section 2320, taking into account the proceeds of the sale or mortgage or deed of trust, unless the court makes an express finding stating the reason why the bond should not be increased. If a bond or additional bond is required under this section, the order confirming the sale of real property of the estate or authorizing the borrowing of money secured by a mortgage or deed of trust on real property of the estate is not effective and the court shall not file the order until the additional bond is filed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 359, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

2333.

(a) In case of a breach of a condition of the bond, an action may be brought against the sureties on the bond for the use and benefit of the ward or conservatee or of any person interested in the estate.

(b) No action may be maintained against the sureties on the bond unless commenced within four years from the discharge or removal of the guardian or conservator or within four years from the date the order surcharging the guardian or conservator becomes final, whichever is later.

(c) In any case, and notwithstanding subdivision (b) of Section 2103, no action may be maintained against the sureties on the bond unless the action commences within six years from the date the judgment under Section 2103 or the later of the orders under subdivision (b) of this section becomes final.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 806, Sec. 11.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

2334.

Where a petition is filed requesting an order that a guardian or conservator be required to give a bond where no bond was originally required, or an objection is made to the sufficiency of the bond, and the petition or affidavit supporting the objection alleges facts showing that the guardian or conservator is failing to use ordinary care and diligence in the management of the estate, the court, by order, may suspend the powers of the guardian or conservator until the matter can be heard and determined.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

2335.

A guardian or conservator who applies for a substitution and release of a surety shall file an account with the application. The court shall not order a substitution unless the account is approved.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Professional Fiduciaries [2340. - 2341.]

2340.

A superior court may not appoint a person to carry out the duties of a professional fiduciary, or permit a person to continue those duties, unless he or she holds a valid, unexpired, unsuspended license as a professional fiduciary under Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 6500) of Division 3 of the Business and Professions Code, is exempt from the definition of “professional fiduciary” under Section 6501 of the Business and Professions Code, or is exempt from the licensing requirements of Section 6530 of the Business and Professions Code.

(History: Amended (as added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 491) by Stats. 2008, Ch. 293, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

2341.

This article shall become operative on July 1, 2008.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 6) and added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 491, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 2007.   Note: This section prescribes a delayed operative date (July 1, 2008) for Article 4, commencing with Section 2340.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 5. Powers and Duties of Guardian or Conservator of the Person [2350. - 2361.]

2350.

As used in this chapter:

(a) “Conservator” means the conservator of the person.

(b) “Guardian” means the guardian of the person.

(c) “Residence” does not include a regional center established pursuant to Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 4620) of Division 4.5 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 293, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

2351.

(a) Subject to subdivision (b), the guardian or conservator, but not a limited conservator, has the care, custody, and control of, and has charge of the education of, the ward or conservatee. This control shall not extend to personal rights retained by the conservatee, including, but not limited to, the right to receive visitors, telephone calls, and personal mail, unless specifically limited by court order. The court may issue an order that specifically grants the conservator the power to enforce the conservatee’s rights to receive visitors, telephone calls, and personal mail, or that directs the conservator to allow those visitors, telephone calls, and personal mail.

(b) Where the court determines that it is appropriate in the circumstances of the particular conservatee, the court, in its discretion, may limit the powers and duties that the conservator would otherwise have under subdivision (a) by an order stating either of the following:

(1) The specific powers that the conservator does not have with respect to the conservatee’s person and reserving the powers so specified to the conservatee.

(2) The specific powers and duties the conservator has with respect to the conservatee’s person and reserving to the conservatee all other rights with respect to the conservatee’s person that the conservator otherwise would have under subdivision (a).

(c) An order under this section (1) may be included in the order appointing a conservator of the person or (2) may be made, modified, or revoked upon a petition subsequently filed, notice of the hearing on the petition having been given for the period and in the manner provided in Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 1460) of Part 1.

(d) The guardian or conservator, in exercising his or her powers, may not hire or refer any business to an entity in
 which he or she has a financial interest except upon authorization of the court. Prior to authorization from the court, the guardian or conservator shall disclose to the court in writing his or her financial interest in the entity. For the purposes of this subdivision, “financial interest” shall mean (1) an ownership interest in a sole proprietorship, a partnership, or a closely held corporation, or (2) an ownership interest of greater than 1 percent of the outstanding shares in a publicly traded corporation, or (3) being an officer or a director of a corporation. This subdivision shall apply only to conservators and guardians required to register with the Statewide Registry under Chapter 13 (commencing with Section 2850).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 92, Sec. 2.   (AB 1085)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

2351.2.

(a) (1) Within 120 calendar days of appointment by the court and no later than 10 days before a hearing to determine the continuation or termination of an existing conservatorship, a conservator granted powers under this chapter shall file with the clerk of the court a care plan for the care, custody, and control of the conservatee as provided in this section. The court may require a conservator to update the care plan at any time. The court shall review the most recent care plan in determining the continuation or termination of the conservatorship. 

(2) (A) The
 conservator shall deliver, pursuant to Section 1215, a copy of any care plan filed pursuant to paragraph (1) to the conservator of the estate, if a separate conservator is appointed, and that conservator’s attorney, the attorney for the conservator, the attorney for the conservatee, and the conservatee. The conservator shall also deliver a copy of the care plan to the conservatee’s spouse or registered domestic partner and relatives within the first degree unless the court determines that
 delivery of the care plan will result in harm to the conservatee. If the conservatee does not have a spouse, registered domestic partner, or relatives within the first degree, to the greatest extent possible, the conservator shall deliver the care plan to the conservatee’s relatives within the second degree, unless the court determines that the delivery of the care plan will result in harm to the conservatee.

(B) Confidential medical information in a care plan shall be redacted in compliance with applicable state and federal medical privacy laws before transmission to a spouse, registered domestic partner, or relative, as described
 in paragraph (1).

(b) The care plan shall include, but not be limited to, all of the following:

(1) A description of the current living arrangement for the conservatee and any plans to modify this living arrangement within the next 12 months.

(2) A description of the conservatee’s current level of care and any plans to modify the level of care within the next 12 months.

(3) A description of the status of the conservatee’s health that lists medications currently prescribed for the conservatee, and any medical treatments, supports, or devices.

(4) A description of the conservator’s schedule of visitation with
 the conservatee and actions to ensure the conservatee is able to exercise their rights to visitation and communications.

(5) A description of the normal activities of the conservatee, including outings and social and recreational activities.

(6) A description of any special problems raised by the court investigator, the court, or any other interested person, and a description of how the conservator has addressed or intends to address those problems.

(7) A description of the conservatee’s financial needs, stating the conservatee’s estimated monthly expenses, including food, entertainment, rent or mortgage, transportation, utilities, medication, clothing, and other relevant health care and living expenses, to the extent the
 conservator has that information.

(8) A list of all health care providers who provide care for the conservatee, including the provider’s name, contact information, license type and number, and a description of the treatment provided by each provider.

(c) The Judicial Council shall, by January 1, 2025, develop and adopt a mandatory form to be used in preparing the care plan required by subdivision (a) with, at a minimum, all of the information required by subdivision (b). The form shall be combined with the information or form required to be submitted to the court by subdivision (c) of Section 2352.5.

(d) (1) If a conservator does not file a care plan as required by subdivision (a), the court may impose a civil penalty in any
 amount up to five hundred dollars ($500), payable to the estate of the conservatee.

(2) If the conservator is a professional fiduciary, in addition to the civil penalty imposed pursuant to paragraph (1), the court may find a failure to file a care plan is a separate and independent reason to refer the conservator to the Professional Fiduciaries Bureau for investigation.

(3) The court may remove the conservator for failure to file a care plan as required by this section.

(e) The care plan shall be confidential and shall be made available only as provided in this section. The court shall have discretion to release the care plan to other persons if it would serve the best interests of the conservatee. The clerk of the
 court shall make provision for limiting disclosure of the care plan exclusively to persons entitled thereto under this section.

(f) The court investigator shall review the most recent care plan when conducting an investigation pursuant to Section 1851.

(g) The requirement to file a care plan is effective January 1, 2025. 

(h) This section does not apply to a limited conservator appointed for a developmentally disabled adult, as set forth in subdivision (d) of Section 1801, if the limited conservator is a relative within the first degree of the
 conservatee.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 705, Sec. 1.   (SB 280)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

2351.5.

(a) Subject to subdivision (b):

(1) The limited conservator has the care, custody, and control of the limited conservatee.

(2) The limited conservator shall secure for the limited conservatee those habilitation or treatment, training, education, medical and psychological services, and social and vocational opportunity as appropriate and as will assist the limited conservatee in the development of maximum self-reliance and independence.

(b) A limited conservator does not have any of the following powers or controls over the limited conservatee unless those powers or controls are specifically requested in the petition for appointment of a limited conservator and granted by the court in its order appointing the limited conservator:

(1) To fix the residence or specific dwelling of the limited conservatee.

(2) Access to the confidential records and papers of the limited conservatee.

(3) To consent or withhold consent to the marriage of, or the entrance into a registered domestic partnership by, the limited conservatee.

(4) The right of the limited conservatee to contract.

(5) The power of the limited conservatee to give or withhold medical consent.

(6) The limited conservatee’s right to control his or her own social and sexual contacts and relationships.

(7) Decisions concerning the education of the limited conservatee.

(c) Any limited conservator, the limited conservatee, or any relative or friend of the limited conservatee may apply by petition to the superior court of the county in which the proceedings are pending to have the limited conservatorship modified by the elimination or addition of any of the powers which must be specifically granted to the limited conservator pursuant to subdivision (b). The petition shall state the facts alleged to establish that the limited conservatorship should be modified. The granting or elimination of those powers is discretionary with the court. Notice of the hearing on the petition shall be given for the period and in the manner provided in Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 1460) of Part 1.

(d) The limited conservator or any relative or friend of the limited conservatee may appear and oppose the petition. The court shall hear and determine the matter according to the laws and procedures relating to the trial of civil actions, including trial by jury if demanded. If any of the powers which must be specifically granted to the limited conservator pursuant to subdivision (b) are granted or eliminated, new letters of limited conservatorship shall be issued reflecting the change in the limited conservator’s powers.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 418, Sec. 28.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

2352.

(a) The guardian may establish the residence of the ward at any place within this state without the permission of the court. The guardian shall select the least restrictive appropriate residence that is available and necessary to meet the needs of the ward, and that is in the best interests of the ward.

(b) The conservator may establish the residence of the conservatee at any place within this state without the permission of the court. The conservator shall select the least restrictive appropriate residence, as described in Section 2352.5, that is available and necessary to meet the needs of the conservatee, and that is in the best interests of the conservatee.

(c) If permission of the court is first obtained, a guardian or conservator may establish the residence of a ward or conservatee at a place not within this state. Notice of the hearing on the petition to establish the residence of the ward or conservatee out of state, together with a copy of the petition, shall be given in the manner required by subdivision (a) of Section 1460 to all persons entitled to notice under subdivision (b) of Section 1511 or subdivision (b) of Section 1822.

(d) (1) An order under subdivision (c) relating to a ward shall require the guardian either to return the ward to this state, or to cause a guardianship proceeding or its equivalent to be commenced in the place of the new residence, when the ward has resided in the place of new residence
 for a period of four months or a longer or shorter period specified in the order.

(2) An order under subdivision (c) relating to a conservatee shall require the conservator to do one of the following when the conservatee has resided in the other state for a period of four months or a longer or shorter period specified in the order:

(A) Return the conservatee to this state.

(B) Petition for transfer of the conservatorship to the other state under Article 3 (commencing with Section 2001) of Chapter 8 of Part 3 and corresponding law of the other state.

(C) Cause a conservatorship proceeding or its equivalent to be commenced in the other state.

(e) (1) The guardian or conservator shall file a notice of change of residence with the court within 30 days of the date of the change. The guardian or conservator shall include in the notice of change of residence a declaration stating that the ward’s or conservatee’s change of residence is consistent with the standard described in subdivision (b).

(2) (A) The guardian or conservator shall deliver pursuant to Section 1215 a copy of the notice to all persons entitled to notice under subdivision (b) of Section 1511 or subdivision (b) of Section 1822 and shall file proof of delivery of the notice with the court. The court may, for good cause, waive the delivery requirement pursuant to this paragraph in order to prevent harm to the conservatee
 or ward.

(B) A conservator also shall provide notice pursuant to subparagraph (A) to any person who has requested special notice of the matter pursuant to Section 2700.

(3) If the guardian or conservator proposes to remove the ward or conservatee from their current residence or personal residence, except as provided by subdivision (c), the guardian or conservator shall deliver pursuant to Section 1215 a notice of their intention to change the residence of the ward or conservatee to all persons entitled to notice under subdivision (b) of Section 1511 and subdivision (b) of Section 1822, and any person who has requested special notice of the matter, pursuant to Section 2700. In the absence of an emergency, that notice shall be delivered at least 15 days before the proposed
 removal of the ward, or at least 20 days of the conservatee, from their current residence or personal residence. If the notice is delivered less than 15 or 20 days before the proposed removal of the ward or conservatee, as applicable, the guardian or conservator shall set forth the basis for the emergency in the notice. The guardian or conservator shall file proof of delivery of that notice with the court.

(f) This section does not apply when the court has made an order under Section 2351 pursuant to which the conservatee retains the right to establish their own residence.

(g) As used in this section, “guardian” or “conservator” includes a proposed guardian or proposed conservator and “ward” or “conservatee” includes a proposed ward or proposed conservatee.

(h) This section does not apply to a person with developmental disabilities for whom the Director of Developmental Services or a regional center, established pursuant to Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 4620) of Division 4.5 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, acts as the conservator.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 455, Sec. 2.   (SB 1106)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

2352.5.

(a) It shall be presumed that the personal residence of the conservatee at the time of commencement of the proceeding is the least restrictive appropriate residence for the conservatee. In any hearing to determine if removal of the conservatee from the conservatee’s personal residence is appropriate, that presumption may be overcome by clear and convincing evidence.

(b) Upon appointment, the conservator shall determine the appropriate level of care for the conservatee.

(1) That determination shall include an evaluation of the level of care existing at the time of commencement of the proceeding and the measures that would be
 necessary to keep the conservatee in their personal residence.

(2) If the conservatee is living at a location other than the conservatee’s personal residence at the commencement of the proceeding, that determination shall either include a plan to return the conservatee to their personal residence or an explanation of the limitations or restrictions on a return of the conservatee to their personal residence in the foreseeable future.

(c) The determination made by the conservator pursuant to subdivision (b) shall be included in the care plan as required by Section 2351.2.

(d) The conservator shall evaluate the conservatee’s placement and level of care if there is a material change in circumstances affecting the
 conservatee’s needs for placement and care.

(e) (1) This section shall not apply to a conservatee with developmental disabilities for whom the Director of Developmental Services or a regional center for the developmentally disabled, established pursuant to Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 4620) of Division 4.5 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, acts as the conservator and who receives services from a regional center pursuant to the Lanterman Developmental Disabilities Act (Division 4.5 (commencing with Section 4500) of the Welfare and Institutions Code).

(2) Services, including residential placement, for a conservatee described in paragraph (1) who is a consumer, as defined in Section 4512 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, shall be identified, delivered,
 and evaluated consistent with the individual program plan process described in Article 2 (commencing with Section 4640) of Chapter 5 of Division 4.5 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 705, Sec. 2.   (SB 280)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

2353.

(a) Subject to subdivision (b), the guardian has the same right as a parent having legal custody of a child to give consent to medical treatment performed upon the ward and to require the ward to receive medical treatment.

(b) Except as provided in subdivision (c), if the ward is 14 years of age or older, no surgery may be performed upon the ward without either (1) the consent of both the ward and the guardian or (2) a court order obtained pursuant to Section 2357 specifically authorizing such treatment.

(c) The guardian may consent to surgery to be performed upon the ward, and may require the ward to receive the surgery, in any case where the guardian determines in good faith based upon medical advice that the case is an emergency case in which the ward faces loss of life or serious bodily injury if the surgery is not performed. In such a case, the consent of the guardian alone is sufficient and no person is liable because the surgery is performed upon the ward without the ward’s consent.

(d) Nothing in this section requires the consent of the guardian for medical or surgical treatment for the ward in any case where the ward alone may consent to such treatment under other provisions of law.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

2354.

(a) If the conservatee has not been adjudicated to lack the capacity to give informed consent for medical treatment, the conservatee may consent to his or her medical treatment. The conservator may also give consent to the medical treatment, but the consent of the conservator is not required if the conservatee has the capacity to give informed consent to the medical treatment, and the consent of the conservator alone is not sufficient under this subdivision if the conservatee objects to the medical treatment.

(b) The conservator may require the conservatee to receive medical treatment, whether or not the conservatee consents to the treatment, if a court order specifically authorizing the medical treatment has been obtained pursuant to Section 2357.

(c) The conservator may consent to medical treatment to be performed upon the conservatee, and may require the conservatee to receive the medical treatment, in any case where the conservator determines in good faith based upon medical advice that the case is an emergency case in which the medical treatment is required because (1) the treatment is required for the alleviation of severe pain or (2) the conservatee has a medical condition which, if not immediately diagnosed and treated, will lead to serious disability or death. In such a case, the consent of the conservator alone is sufficient and no person is liable because the medical treatment is performed upon the conservatee without the conservatee’s consent.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

2355.

(a) If the conservatee has been adjudicated to lack the capacity to make health care decisions, the conservator has the exclusive authority to make health care decisions for the conservatee that the conservator in good faith based on medical advice determines to be necessary. The conservator shall make health care decisions for the conservatee in accordance with the conservatee’s individual health care instructions, if any, and other wishes to the extent known to the conservator. Otherwise, the conservator shall make the decision in accordance with the conservator’s determination of the conservatee’s best interest. In determining the conservatee’s best interest, the conservator shall consider the conservatee’s personal values to the extent known to the conservator. The conservator may require the conservatee to receive the health care, whether or not the conservatee objects. In this case, the health care decision of the conservator alone is sufficient and no person is liable because the health care is administered to the conservatee without the conservatee’s consent. For the purposes of this subdivision, “health care” and “health care decision” have the meanings provided in Sections 4615 and 4617, respectively.

(b) If prior to the establishment of the conservatorship the conservatee was an adherent of a religion whose tenets and practices call for reliance on prayer alone for healing, the treatment required by the conservator under the provisions of this section shall be by an accredited practitioner of that religion.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 658, Sec. 12.   Effective January 1, 2000.   Operative July 1, 2000, by Sec. 43 of Ch. 658.)
-------------------------------------------

2356.

(a) A ward or conservatee shall not be placed in a mental health treatment facility under this division against his or her will. Involuntary
 civil placement of a ward or conservatee in a mental health treatment facility may be obtained only pursuant to Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 5150) or Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 5350) of Part 1 of Division 5 of the Welfare and Institutions Code. Nothing in this subdivision precludes the placing of a ward in a state hospital under Section 6000 of the Welfare and Institutions Code upon application of the guardian as provided in that section.

(b) An experimental drug as defined in Section 111515 of the Health and Safety Code shall not be prescribed for or administered to a ward or conservatee under this division. An experimental drug may be prescribed for or administered to a ward or conservatee only as provided in Article 4 (commencing with Section 111515)
 of Chapter 6 of Part 5 of Division 104 of the Health and Safety Code.

(c) Convulsive treatment as defined in Section 5325 of the Welfare and Institutions Code shall not be performed on a ward or conservatee under this division. Convulsive treatment may be performed on a ward or conservatee only as provided in Article 7 (commencing with Section 5325) of Chapter 2 of Part 1 of Division 5 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.

(d) A
 minor shall not be sterilized under this division.

(e) This chapter is subject to a valid and effective advance health care directive under the Health Care Decisions Law (Division 4.7 (commencing with Section 4600)).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 117, Sec. 1.   (AB 468)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

2356.5.

(a) The Legislature hereby finds and declares all of the following:

(1) That a person with a major neurocognitive disorder, as defined in the last published edition of the Diagnostic and Statistical Manual of Mental Disorders, should have a conservatorship to serve the person’s unique and special needs.

(2) That, by adding powers to the probate conservatorship for people with major neurocognitive disorders, their unique and special needs can be met. This will reduce costs to the conservatee and the family of the conservatee, reduce costly administration by state and county government, and safeguard the basic dignity and rights
 of the conservatee.

(3) That it is the intent of the Legislature to recognize that the administration of psychotropic medications has been, and can be, abused by caregivers and, therefore, granting powers to a conservator to authorize these medications for the treatment of major neurocognitive disorders requires the protections specified in this section.

(b) Notwithstanding any other law, a conservator may authorize the placement of a conservatee in a secured perimeter residential care facility for the elderly operated pursuant to Section 1569.698 of the Health and Safety Code, and that has a care plan that meets the requirements of Section 87705 of Title 22 of the California Code of Regulations, upon a court’s finding, by clear and convincing evidence, of all of the
 following:

(1) The conservatee has a major neurocognitive disorder, as defined in the last published edition of the Diagnostic and Statistical Manual of Mental Disorders.

(2) The conservatee lacks the capacity to give informed consent to this placement and has at least one mental function deficit pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 811, and this deficit significantly impairs the person’s ability to understand and appreciate the consequences of their actions pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 811.

(3) The conservatee needs, or would benefit from, a restricted and secure environment, as demonstrated by evidence presented by the physician or psychologist referred to in paragraph (3) of subdivision (f).

(4) The court finds that the proposed placement in a locked facility is the least restrictive placement appropriate to the needs of the conservatee.

(c) Notwithstanding any other law, a conservator of a person may authorize the administration of medications appropriate for the care and treatment of a major neurocognitive disorder, upon a court’s finding, by clear and convincing evidence, of all of the following:

(1) The conservatee has a major neurocognitive disorder, as defined in the last published edition of the Diagnostic and Statistical Manual of Mental Disorders.

(2) The conservatee lacks the capacity to give informed consent to the administration of
 medications appropriate to the care of a major neurocognitive disorder, has at least one mental function deficit pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 811, and this deficit or deficits significantly impairs the person’s ability to understand and appreciate the consequences of their actions pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 811.

(3) The conservatee needs, or would benefit from, appropriate medication, as demonstrated by evidence presented by the physician or psychologist referred to in paragraph (3) of subdivision (f).

(d) Pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 2355, in the case of a person who is an adherent of a religion whose tenets and practices call for a reliance on prayer alone for healing, the treatment required by the conservator under subdivision (c) shall be by
 an accredited practitioner of that religion in lieu of the administration of medications.

(e) A conservatee who is to be placed in a facility pursuant to this section shall not be placed in a mental health rehabilitation center as described in Section 5675 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, or in an institution for mental disease as described in Section 5900 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.

(f) A petition for authority to act under this section is governed by Section 2357, except as follows:

(1) The conservatee shall be represented by an attorney pursuant to Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 1470) of Part 1. Upon granting or denying authority to a conservator under this section, the court shall discharge
 the attorney or order the continuation of the legal representation, consistent with the standard set forth in subdivision (a) of Section 1470.

(2) The conservatee shall be produced at the hearing, unless excused pursuant to Section 1893.

(3) The petition shall be supported by a declaration of a licensed physician, or a licensed psychologist within the scope of their licensure, regarding each of the findings required to be made under this section for any power requested, except that the psychologist has at least two years of experience in diagnosing major neurocognitive disorders.

(4) The petition may be filed by any of the persons designated in Section 1891.
